hr-HR: Profil podnice: Podesivi; Visoki profil (≥ 10 in); Niski profil (4 – 6 in); Standardni profil (7 – 9 in); Ekstra niski profil (≤ 4 in); Ostalo
tr: Baza yüksekliği: Ayarlanabilir; Yüksek profil (≥ 10 inç); Düşük profil (4-6 inç); Standart profil (7-9 inç); Ultra düşük (≤ 4 inç); Diğer
pt-BR: Perfil da base: Ajustável; Perfil alto (≥ 10 pol.); Perfil baixo (4-6 pol.); Perfil padrão (7-9 pol.); Ultrabaixo (≤ 4 pol.); Outro
da: Profil for fundament: Justerbar; Høj profil (≥ 10 tommer); Lav profil (4-6 tommer); Standardprofil (7-9 tommer); Ekstra lav (≤ 4 tommer); Andet
en: Foundation profile: Adjustable; High profile (≥ 10 in); Low profile (4-6 in); Standard profile (7-9 in); Ultra low (≤ 4 in); Other
fi: Sängynpohja: Säädettävä; Korkea profiili (≥ 10 in); Matala profiili (4–6 in); Vakioprofiili (7–9 in); Erittäin matala (≤ 4 in); Muu
cs: Profil základu: Nastavitelný; Vysoký profil (≥ 10 palců); Nízký profil (4–6 palců); Standardní profil (7–9 palců); Ultra nízký (≤ 4 palce); Jiné
bg-BG: Профил на основата: Регулируем; Висок профил (≥ 10 инча); Нисък профил (4-6 инча); Стандартен профил (7-9 инча); Ултра нисък (≤ 4 инча); Друго
it: Profilo Foundations: Regolabile; Profilo alto (≥ 10 pollici); Profilo basso (4-6 pollici); Profilo standard (7-9 pollici); Ultra basso (≤ 4 pollici); Altro
ja: Foundationsプロファイル: 調整可能; ハイプロファイル (10 インチ以上); ロープロファイル (4〜6 インチ); スタンダードプロファイル (7〜9 インチ); ウルトラロー (4 インチ以下); その他
nl: Bedbodem profiel: Verstelbaar; Hoog profiel (≥ 10 inch); Laag profiel (4-6 inch); Standaardprofiel (7-9 inch); Ultralaag (≤ 4 inch); Overige
nb: Grunnlagsprofil: Justerbar; Høy profil (≥ 10 tommer); Lav profil (4–6 tommer); Standardprofil (7–9 tommer); Svært lav (≤ 4 tommer); Annet
hu: Alap profilja: Állítható; Magas profil (≥ 10 in); Alacsony profil (4–6 in); Normál profil (7–9 in); Rendkívül alacsony (≤ 4 in); Egyéb
zh-TW: 床墊底座高度類型: 可調整; 高底座 (≥ 10 吋); 低底座 (4-6 吋); 標準底座 (7-9 吋); 極低底座 (≤ 4 吋); 其他
sv: Profil för bottenplatta: Justerbar; Hög profil (≥ 10 tum); Låg profil (4–6 tum); Standardprofil (7–9 tum); Ultralåg (≤ 4 tum); Övrigt
lt-LT: Pagrindo profilis: Reguliuojamas; Aukštas profilis (≥ 10 col.); Žemas profilis (4–6 col.); Standartinis profilis (7–9 col.); Itin žemas (≤ 4 col.); Kita
sk-SK: Profil základov: Nastaviteľné; Vysoký profil (≥ 10 palcov); Nízky profil (4 – 6 palcov); Štandardný profil (7 – 9 palcov); Ultra nízky (≤ 4 palce); Iné
ko: 파운데이션 프로필: 조절 가능; 하이 프로파일(10인치 이상); 로우 프로파일(4~6인치); 표준 프로파일(7~9인치); 초저 프로파일(4인치 이하); 기타
el: Προφίλ βάσης στρώματος: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Υψηλό προφίλ (≥ 10 in); Χαμηλό προφίλ (4-6 in); Κανονικό προφίλ (7-9 in); Πολύ χαμηλό (≤ 4 in); Άλλο
ru: Профиль основания: Регулируемый; Высокий профиль (≥ 10 дюймов); Низкий профиль (4–6 дюймов); Стандартный профиль (7–9 дюймов); Ультранизкий (≤ 4 дюймов); Другое
de: Profil der Unterkonstruktion: Verstellbar; Hohes Profil (≥ 10 Zoll); Niedriges Profil (4-6 Zoll); Standardprofil (7-9 Zoll); Sehr niedrig (≤ 4 Zoll); Sonstiges
sl-SI: Profil Foundations: Prilagodljivo; Visok profil (≥ 10 in); Nizek profil (4–6 in); Standardni profil (7–9 in); Zelo nizek profil (≤ 4 in); Drugo
pt-PT: Perfil Foundations: Ajustável; Perfil alto (≥ 10 pol.); Perfil baixo (4 a 6 pol.); Perfil padrão (7 a 9 pol.); Ultrabaixo (≤ 4 pol.); Outro
th: ข้อมูลพื้นฐาน: ปรับได้; ทรงสูง (≥ 10 นิ้ว); ทรงเตี้ย (4-6 นิ้ว); ทรงมาตรฐาน (7-9 นิ้ว); ต่ำพิเศษ (≤ 4 นิ้ว); อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Profilul fundației: Ajustabil; Profil înalt (≥ 10 in); Profil redus (4-6 in); Profil standard (7-9 in); Ultra-jos (≤ 4 in); Altele
vi: Kiểu dáng đế: Có thể điều chỉnh; Mức cao (≥ 10 inch); Mức thấp (4-6 inch); Mức tiêu chuẩn (7-9 inch); Siêu thấp (≤ 4 inch); Khác
zh-CN: 基础轮廓: 可调节; 高型（≥ 10 英寸）; 低矮型（4-6 英寸）; 标准型（7-9 英寸）; 超低型（≤ 4 英寸）; 其他
es: Perfil de base: Ajustable; Perfil alto (≥ 10 pulg.); Perfil bajo (4-6 pulg.); Perfil estándar (7-9 pulg.); Perfil ultrabajo (≤ 4 pulg.); Otro
pl: Profil podkładu: Regulowany; Wysoki profil (≥ 10 cali); Niski profil (4–6 cali); Standardowy profil (7–9 cali); Bardzo niski (≤ 4 cali); Inny
fr: Profil de hauteur du sommier: Réglable; Profil haut (≥ 10 po); Profil bas (4 à 6 po); Profil standard (7 à 9 po); Ultra bas (≤ 4 po); Autre